Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CANCELLATION; REMAINING BALANCE FROM 2018 SCHOOL SAFETY GRANTS.new text end new text begin Any unobligated amount remaining from the appropriation in Laws 2018, chapter 214, article 1, section 4, subdivision 3, for school safety grants is canceled on the effective date of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LAW ENFORCEMENT EMERGENCY ENTRY DEVICES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Law enforcement emergency entry devices. new text end new text begin (a) For law enforcement emergency entry devices at schools: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,810,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2025 new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision: new text end new text begin (1) "eligible applicant" means a special or independent school district, a charter school, or a cooperative unit serving students; and new text end new text begin (2) "law enforcement emergency entry device" means an exterior secure master key box meeting Underwriters Laboratories Standard 1037 installed at the school building permitting emergency access by law enforcement from the exterior of a school building. new text end new text begin (c) An eligible applicant may apply to the commissioner of education in the form and manner specified by the commissioner for a law enforcement emergency entry device grant for each of the applicant's school buildings regularly serving students. The maximum grant per building is $1,000. new text end new text begin (d) If the commissioner receives more applications for grants than money is available, the commissioner must first award one grant to each eligible applicant, and then award remaining money as grants to applicants on a lottery basis. new text end new text begin (e) An eligible applicant receiving a grant under this section must update its school safety plan to include the necessary information on its law enforcement emergency entry devices. new text end new text begin (f) Up to five percent of the appropriation may be retained by the agency for administrative costs. new text end new text begin (g) This appropriation is available until June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin (h) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end